California statutes. Education Code
(c) The option of part-time employment must be exercised at the request of the employee and can be revoked only with the mutual consent of the employer and the employee.

(d) The employee shall be paid a salary which is the pro rata share of the salary the employee would be earning had the employee not elected to exercise the option of part-time employment but shall retain all other rights and benefits for which the employee makes the payments that would be required if the employee remained in full-time employment.

The employee shall receive health benefits in the same manner as a full-time employee.

This section shall only be applicable to academic teaching employees, librarians, counselors, and student affairs officers who receive no higher salary than the maximum paid to a department chairman.

If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

89516.5.

Whenever possible:

(a) Part-time faculty should be informed of assignments at least six weeks in advance.

(b) Part-time faculty should be paid for the first week of an assignment when class is canceled less than two weeks before the beginning of a semester. If a class meets more than once per week, part-time faculty should be paid for all classes that were scheduled for that week.

(c) The names of part-time faculty, once they are assigned to a course, should be listed in the schedule of classes rather than just described as “staff” or “faculty.”

(d) The names of part-time faculty, once they are assigned to a course, should be listed in the course schedule provided to students, faculty, and staff, rather than just described as “staff” or “faculty.”

(e) Part-time faculty should be considered to be an integral part of their departments and given all the rights normally afforded to full-time faculty in the areas of book selection, participation in department
 activities, and the use of college resources, including, but not limited to, telephones, copy machines, supplies, office space, mailboxes, clerical staff, library, and professional development.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 418, Sec. 2.   (AB 2834)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

89517.

(a) The minimum and maximum salary limits for laborers, workmen, and mechanics employed on an hourly or per diem basis need not be uniform throughout the state, but the trustees shall ascertain, as to each such position, the general prevailing rate of such wages in the various localities of the state.

In fixing such minimum and maximum salary limits within the various localities of the state, the trustees shall take into account the prevailing rates of wages in the localities in which the employee is to work and other relevant factors, and shall not fix the minimum salary limits below the general prevailing rate so ascertained for the various localities.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

89518.

(a) Any librarian employed by the trustees on a 12-month basis in a fiscal year has the right to elect to be employed for one or more fiscal years on a 10-month basis. The compensation of any librarian making the election shall be reduced for any such fiscal year in the same proportion as the compensation of instructional academic employees whose fiscal year employment basis is changed from a 12-month basis to a 10-month basis.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

89519.

(a) The trustees shall grant a leave of absence without pay for the purposes of the pregnancy, childbirth or the recovery therefrom of a female employee, for a period as determined by the employee not exceeding one year to any permanent employee under the jurisdiction of the trustees. When the employee has notified the trustees as to the period of the leave of absence required, any change in the length of the period of leave shall not be effective unless approved by the trustees.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

89519.5.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), the trustees shall grant to an employee, who has exhausted all available sick leave, the following leaves of absence with pay:

(1) A leave of absence, not exceeding 30 days in a one-year period, to an employee who is an organ donor, for the purpose of donating the employee’s organ to another person.

(2) A leave of absence, not exceeding five days in a one-year period, to an employee who is a bone marrow donor, for the purpose of donating the employee’s bone marrow to another person.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), the trustees shall grant an additional unpaid leave
 of absence, not exceeding 30 business days in a one-year period, to an employee who has exhausted all available sick leave and is an organ donor, for the purpose of donating the employee’s organ to another person.

(c) To receive a leave of absence pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), an employee shall provide written verification to the trustees that the employee is an organ or bone marrow donor and that there is a medical necessity for the donation of the organ or bone marrow.

(d) Any period of time during which an employee is required to be absent from the employee’s position by reason of being an organ or bone marrow donor is not a break in the employee’s continuous service for the purpose of the employee’s right to salary adjustments, sick leave, vacation, annual leave, or seniority.

(e) If an employee is unable
 to return to work beyond the time or period that the employee is granted leave pursuant to this section, the employee shall be paid any vacation balance, annual leave balance, or accumulated compensable overtime. The payment shall be computed by projecting the accumulated time on a calendar basis as though the employee was taking time off. If, during the period of projection, the employee is able to return to work, the employee shall be returned to the employee’s former position.

(f) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that, if those provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the
 Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 316, Sec. 1.   (AB 1223)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

89520.

(a) The provisions of Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 19400) of Chapter 7 of Part 2 of Division 5 of the Government Code, relating to upward mobility, shall be applicable to the California State University System. The trustees shall administer the program for its employees and shall have the powers and duties with respect to employees of the California State University System, as are given to the State Personnel Board in Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 19400) of Chapter 7 of Part 2 of Division 5 of the Government Code, with respect to state civil service employees. In the event of conflict between the provisions of Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 19400) of Chapter 7 of Part 2 of Division 5 of the Government Code and the antidiscrimination and affirmative action requirements of Title VI and Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended; Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972, as amended; Executive Order Number 11246, as amended, and the rules and regulations adopted under each of these, the federal law shall prevail.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

89521.

(a) The trustees shall, as part of the hiring process for an appointment to an academic, athletic, or administrative position with the California State University, do all of the following:

(1) (A) Require an applicant to disclose any final administrative decision or final judicial decision issued within the last seven years from the date of submission of the application determining that the applicant committed sexual harassment.

(B) Permit applicants to disclose if they have filed an appeal with the previous employer or, if applicable, with the United States Department of Education.

(2) Require an applicant to sign a release form that authorizes, in the event the applicant reaches the final stages of the application process, the release of information by the applicant’s previous employers to the campus of the California State University concerning any substantiated allegations of misconduct in order to permit the campus to evaluate the released information with respect to the criteria for a potential job placement.

(3) If an applicant reaches the final stages of the application process for the intended academic, athletic, or administrative position, require campuses of the California State University to use the release form signed pursuant to paragraph (2) to engage in a reasonable attempt to obtain information from the previous employer concerning any
 substantiated allegations of misconduct.

(b) The California State University shall not ask an applicant to disclose, orally or in writing, information concerning any final administrative decision or final judicial decision described in subdivision (a), including any inquiry about an applicable decision on any employment application, until the California State University has determined that the applicant meets the minimum employment qualifications stated in the notice issued for the position.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Applicant” means a person who submits an employment application for an academic, athletic, or administrative position, but does not include
 a person who is a current employee and is hired or rehired for a different position with the same campus.

(2) “Final administrative decision” means the written determination of whether or not sexual harassment occurred as determined by the decisionmaker following the final investigative report and the subsequent hearing.

(3) “Final judicial decision” means a final determination of a matter submitted to a court that is recorded in a judgment or order of that court.

(4) “Misconduct” means any violation of the policies governing employee conduct at the applicant’s previous place of employment, including, but not limited to, violations of policies prohibiting sexual harassment, sexual assault, or other forms of harassment or
 discrimination, as defined by the employer.

(5) “Sexual harassment” has the same meaning as described in subdivision (a) of Section 66262.5 or, if applicable, as defined in Section 106.30 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(6) “Substantiated allegation” means an allegation that has been sustained based upon a burden of proof of at least a preponderance of the evidence.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 415, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 673, Sec. 5.   (AB 810)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

89522.

All applications for appointment to academic, administrative and nonacademic positions shall include a place for listing volunteer experience and such experience shall be considered if it is relevant to the position being applied for.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 544.)
-------------------------------------------

89523.

(a) Any employee who, immediately prior to becoming an employee, was an employee of an auxiliary organization as provided in Section 89900, and whose functions and employment were, subsequent to January 1, 1969, transferred to and assumed by a state university or college, shall be entitled to accumulate credit for vacation at the rate to which he or she would have been entitled if his or her employment by the auxiliary organization had been employment by a state university or college.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1040, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

89524.

(a) Any employee who, immediately prior to becoming an employee, was an employee of an auxiliary organization as provided in Section 89900, and whose functions and employment were, subsequent to January 1, 1969, transferred to and assumed by a state university or college, shall be entitled to retain accumulated sick leave, and to accumulate sick leave credit as if his or her employment by the auxiliary organization had been employment by a state university or college.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1040, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

89525.

When an employee uses sick leave or vacation, or both, because of an injury compensable under the Labor Code, and the California State University is reimbursed by a third person for its damages by reason of this use, there shall be granted, for credit to the employee’s sick leave or vacation account, sick leave or vacation equivalent to the amount so used or proportionately if reimbursement is only in part. If the California State University does not collect from the third person the full amount of the compensation paid and other damages for which it is liable to the employee, and if the amount collected is not itemized so that there may be ascertained the amount collected in reimbursement for the sick leave or vacation used, the sick leave or vacation to be credited shall be in the same ratio to the sick leave or vacation used as the total amount collected bears to the total amount of the California State University’s damages. “Sick leave” or “vacation,” as used in this rule, includes sick leave or vacation credit used to augment disability indemnity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1040, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

89526.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Campus” means a campus of the California State University.

(2) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California State University.

(b) The chancellor’s office shall annually develop enrollment targets for each campus. These enrollment targets shall be informed by the campus’s actual enrollment history, demographics, funding, and other factors determined by the chancellor’s office.

(c) On or before
 March 15 of each year, the chancellor’s office shall report the enrollment targets developed under subdivision (b) for the following fiscal year to the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Assembly Committee on Budget, and the Department of Finance.

(d) The chancellor’s office shall include, in the report described in subdivision (c), enrollment data trends that provide a comparison of actual enrollment and the enrollment targets under subdivision (b), disaggregated by campus.

(e) If the chancellor’s office determines that a campus has experienced an unusual decline in enrollment, cannot meet enrollment the targets under subdivision (b), or has failed to meet past enrollment targets under subdivision (b), the chancellor’s office may require a campus to complete a turnaround plan that details how the campus’s budget may be
 adjusted to reflect the campus’s actual enrollment. The chancellor’s office shall provide a copy of all data collected and reported under this section to the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Assembly Committee on Budget, and the Department of Finance.

(f) A report submitted under this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 251, Sec. 7.   (AB 167)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

89527.

(a) An officer or employee who is or may be entitled to temporary disability indemnity under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) or Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 6100) of the Labor Code shall receive any accumulated sick leave, or accumulated compensable overtime, or accumulated vacation for the absence. The trustees shall decrease the charge of sick leave, or compensable overtime, or vacation in the amount of temporary disability payment received so that the officer or employee shall not receive payment in excess of full salary or wage.

If an officer or employee does not wish to use his or her accumulated sick leave, or accumulated compensable overtime, or accumulated vacation, he or she shall notify his or her appointing power within 15 days after the injury is reported to the appointing power. After the 15 days his or her accumulations shall be used until the date he or she notifies the appointing power in writing that he or she no longer wishes to use the accumulations. When computing sick leave, or overtime, or vacation under this section the employee shall be given credit for any holidays that occur during the period of absence hereunder.

He or she is, nevertheless, entitled to medical, surgical, and hospital treatment as provided in the Labor Code. When his or her accumulated sick leave, or overtime, or vacation, or all, are exhausted, he or she is still entitled to receive disability indemnity.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1040, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

89528.

(a) In order to improve the recruitment and retention of faculty in specified academic disciplines, the trustees shall establish a supplemental salary program.

Each fiscal year, the trustees shall identify both of the following:

(1) Those academic disciplines for which recruiting and retaining competent faculty has been a problem because the faculty salaries generally applicable are not competitive with salaries offered by industry or by other educational institutions.

(2) Those faculty members in the academic disciplines identified pursuant to paragraph (1) who shall qualify for participation in the supplemental salary program.

The memorandum of understanding between the trustees and the appropriate faculty bargaining unit shall specify the implementation plan for the supplemental salary program.

(b) This section shall be operative only for those years in which the Budget Act appropriates funds specifically for the supplemental salary program pursuant to this section.

(c) If this section is in conflict with a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1304, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.1. Industrial Disability Leave [89529. - 89529.11.]

89529.

(a) This article applies to employees of the trustees who are members of the Public Employees’ Retirement System or the State Teachers’ Retirement System in compensated employment on and after July 1, 1974.

(b) This article also applies to a participant in the optional retirement program pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 89600), provided that he or she would otherwise be eligible to participate in the Public Employees’ Retirement System except for the election to participate in the optional retirement program.

(c) This article does not apply to employees of the trustees who are included in the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 4800) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 385, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

89529.01.

If the provisions of this article are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89529.02.

As used in this article:

(a) “Industrial disability leave” means temporary disability as defined in Divisions 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and 4.5 (commencing with Section 6100) of the Labor Code and includes any period in which the disability is permanent and stationary and the disabled employee is undergoing vocational rehabilitation.

(b) “Full pay” means the gross base pay earnable by the employee and subject to retirement contribution if he or she had not vacated his or her position.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89529.03.

If an employee is temporarily disabled by illness or injury arising out of and in the course of state employment, he or she shall become entitled, regardless of his or her period of service, to receive industrial disability leave and payments, in lieu of workers’ compensation temporary disability payments and payment under Section 89527, for a period not exceeding 52 weeks within two years from the first day of disability. The payments shall be in the amount of the employee’s full pay less withholding based on his or her exemptions in effect on the date of his or her disability for federal income taxes, state income taxes, and social security taxes not to exceed 22 working days of disability subject to Section 89529.08. Thereafter, the payment shall be two-thirds of full pay. Payments shall be additionally adjusted to offset disability benefits, excluding those disability benefits payable from the State Teachers’ Retirement System, the employee may receive from other employer-subsidized programs, except that no adjustment will be made for benefits to which the employee’s family is entitled up to a maximum of three-quarters of full pay. Contributions to the Public Employees’ Retirement System or the State Teachers’ Retirement System shall be deducted in the amount based on full pay. Discretionary deductions of the employee including those for coverage under a state health benefits plan in which the employee is enrolled shall continue to be deducted unless canceled by the employee. State employer contributions to the Public Employees’ Retirement System and state employer normal retirement contributions to the State Teachers’ Retirement System shall be made on the basis of full pay and state contributions pursuant to Sections 22871 and 22885 of the Government Code because of the employee’s enrollment in a health benefits plan shall continue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 69, Sec. 3.   Effective June 24, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

89529.04.

An employee who is receiving industrial disability leave benefits shall continue to receive all employee benefits which he or she would have received had he or she not incurred disability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89529.05.

The disabled employee shall not receive temporary disability indemnity or sick leave or annual leave with pay for any period for which he or she receives industrial disability leave; however, he or she may elect to waive the provisions of this article and to receive disability indemnity pursuant to Divisions 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and 4.5 (commencing with Section 6100) of the Labor Code and to receive payments under Section 89527 in lieu of the benefits provided in this article. If the amount of the employee’s benefits payable under this article is less than the amount he or she would receive under Divisions 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and 4.5 (commencing with Section 6100) of the Labor Code, the employee shall be deemed to have rejected the benefits of this article and shall be paid benefits pursuant to Divisions 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and 4.5 (commencing with Section 6100) of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89529.06.

Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 6200) of the Labor Code shall not apply to employees to which this article applies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89529.07.

If an employee continues to be temporarily disabled after termination of benefits under this article, he or she shall be entitled to the benefits provided by Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and 4.5 (commencing with Section 6100) of the Labor Code and to payments under Section 89527.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89529.08.

(a) If an illness or injury causes temporary disability, the employee shall be placed on industrial disability leave on the fourth calendar day after the injured employee leaves work as the result of the illness or injury, except that in case the injury causes disability of more than 14 days or necessitates hospitalization, the employee shall be placed on industrial disability leave from the first day he or she leaves work or is hospitalized as a result of the injury.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the disability payment shall be made from the first day the injured employee leaves work as a result of the injury, if the injury is the result of a criminal act of violence against the employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89529.09.

Payments shall be contingent on the complete medical certification of the illness or injury including diagnosis and any prognosis of recovery. Further, payments shall be contingent on the employee’s agreement to cooperate and participate in a reasonable and appropriate vocational rehabilitation plan when furnished by the state subject to appropriate medical approval as determined by the trustees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89529.10.

The trustees or its designee shall adopt any rules and regulations necessary for the administration of this article for its employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89529.11.

(a) This article shall be effective upon the adoption of applicable rules and regulations, but not later than January 1, 1975.

(b) The reenactment of this article at the 1987–88 Regular Session of the Legislature does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.2. Nonindustrial Disability Insurance [89529.15. - 89529.25.]

89529.15.

As used in this article:

(a) “Employee” means any of the following:

(1) A permanent or probationary full-time employee of the trustees, regardless of period of service, who is a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System or the State Teachers’ Retirement System in compensated employment on or after October 1, 1976.

(2) A permanent or probationary part-time or intermittent employee of the trustees with at least the equivalent of six monthly compensated pay periods of service in the 18 months of pay periods immediately preceding the pay period in which the disability begins, who is a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System or the State Teachers’ Retirement System in compensated employment on or after January 1, 1979.

(3) In addition to those eligible under paragraph (1), an employee of the trustees appointed half-time or more for one year of service or one academic year, as defined by the trustees, or more, who is a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System or the State Teachers’ Retirement System in compensated employment on or after January 1, 1979.

(4) A permanent or probationary full-time employee of the trustees, regardless of period of service, who is a participant in the optional retirement program pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 89600), provided that he or she would otherwise be eligible to participate in the Public Employees’ Retirement System except for the election to participate in the optional retirement program.

(b) “Full pay” means the gross base salary earnable by the employee and subject to retirement contribution on the date of the commencement of his or her disability.

(c) “Disability” or “disabled” includes mental or physical illness and mental or physical injury including any illness or injury resulting from pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical condition. An employee is deemed disabled on any day in which, because of his or her physical, mental, or medical condition, he or she is unable to perform his or her regular or customary work.

(d) “Disability benefit period”, with respect to any individual, means the continuous period of disability beginning with the first day with respect to which the individual files a valid claim for nonindustrial disability benefits. For the purpose of this article, two consecutive periods of disability due to the same or related cause or condition and separated by a period of not more than 14 days shall be considered as one disability benefit period.

(e) “Appeals board” means the California Unemployment Insurance Appeals Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 385, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

89529.16.

If the provisions of this article are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if those provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 670, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

89529.17.

(a) When an employee is disabled, whether temporarily or permanently, the employee shall become entitled, subject to the provisions of this article, to receive nonindustrial disability benefits in an amount equal to one-half pay, but not to exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per week, payable monthly for a period not exceeding 26 weeks for any one disability benefit period, but in no case shall benefits be payable for any day on and after death or separation or retirement from state service.

(b) For purposes of this section, the “full pay” of a part-time or intermittent employee only shall be established in accordance with the following:

(1) Where the part-time employment is regularly scheduled and is a fixed proportion of the established workweek, the payments shall be determined on the basis of that proportionate part of the monthly rate.

(2) Where employment is intermittent or irregular, the payments shall be determined on the basis of the proportionate part of a monthly rate established by the total hours actually employed in the 18 monthly pay periods immediately preceding the pay period in which the disability begins as compared to the regular rate for a full-time employee in the same group or class.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 670, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

89529.18.

A disabled employee is eligible to receive nonindustrial disability benefits under this article equal to one-seventh of his or her weekly benefit amount specified in Section 89529.17 for each full day during which he or she is unemployed due to a disability only if the Director of Employment Development finds that:

(a) He or she has made a claim for disability benefits as required by authorized regulations.

(b) He or she has been disabled for a waiting period of seven consecutive days during each disability benefit period with respect to which waiting period no benefits under this article are payable except for confinement in a hospital or nursing home for at least one day.

(c) He or she has exhausted all sick leave to which he or she was entitled under Article 1 (commencing with Section 89501) of this chapter.

(d) Except for an individual described in Section 2709 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, he or she has submitted to such reasonable examinations as the Director of Employment Development may require for the purpose of determining his or her mental or physical disability.

(e) He or she has filed a certificate described in Section 2708 or 2709 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(f) Except as otherwise provided, he or she meets, in all respects, the eligibility requirements imposed on individuals by Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code for receipt of umemployment compensation disability benefits.

In case of any conflict between Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of the Unemployment Insurance Code and this article, this article shall prevail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 670, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

89529.19.

A disabled employee shall be eligible to receive nonindustrial disability benefits under this article without being required to use any vacation leave accrued under Article 1 (commencing with Section 89501) of this chapter, unless the employee, in his or her sole discretion, elects to use the vacation leave in lieu of receiving benefits under this article, in which case benefits under this article shall not commence until the employee has exhausted the accrued vacation leave.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 670, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

89529.20.

An employee is not eligible for disability benefits under this article with respect to any period for which the Director of Employment Development finds that he or she has received or is entitled to receive unemployment compensation benefits under Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code or under an unemployment compensation act of any other state or of the federal government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 670, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

89529.21.

(a) Except as provided in this section, an individual is not eligible for disability benefits under this article for any day of unemployment and disability for which he or she has received, or is entitled to receive, “other benefits” in the form of cash payments.

(b) “Other benefits”, as used in this section, means:

(1) Temporary disability indemnity under a workers’ compensation law of this state or of any other state or of the federal government or under Article 1.1 (commencing with Section 89529).

(2) Temporary disability benefits under any employer’s liability law of this state or of any other state or of the federal government.
